Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF920.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2372YH (3) 91 lh/ko H.F. 920 Section 1. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ DOUBLE 1 UP FOOD BUCKS PROGRAM ââ SUPPLEMENTAL APPROPRIATION. There 2 is appropriated from the general fund of the state to the 3 department of health and human services for the fiscal year 4 beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, in addition 5 to any other funding appropriated for such purpose, the 6 following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 7 used for the purposes designated: 8 To provide grants to support the double up food bucks 9 program administered by the Iowa healthiest state initiative 10 to make fresh fruits and vegetables sold at farmers markets, 11 grocery stores, and other participating locations accessible 12 to individuals and families who reside in this state and 13 receive assistance through the federal supplemental nutrition 14 assistance program: 15 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,000,000 16 1. Beginning January 1, 2026, the department of health 17 and human services, in cooperation with the Iowa healthiest 18 state initiative, shall submit an annual report to the general 19 assembly that provides the following information related to the 20 double up food bucks program, including but not limited to: 21 a. The number of participants in the program. 22 b. The participating locations, including location type, 23 providing access to participants in the program. 24 c. The annual redemption amount and the annual redemption 25 rate of participants in the program. 26 2. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated under 27 this section shall not revert at the close of the fiscal year, 28 but shall remain available for the purposes designated. 29